District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.08

Corporate name.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 183, ch. 269, § 8
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 28(c), 44 DCR 1271
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-101.08.
1981 Ed., § 29-308.
1973 Ed., § 29-906.

Prior Codifications